fst/src/phonology.twol
! Declarative record of the dental realization layer (printed pp. 844--858).
!
! Dvd and Dvl are not two past morphemes.  They are orthographic classes
! supplied by the attested formal pair because Persian spelling does not expose
! every conditioning phonological segment.  This transducer is composed with
! the lexc result before optimization.

Alphabet
    Dvd:د
    Dvl:ت
    د:د
    ت:ت
;

Rules
    "Dental D after a voiced environment"
    Dvd:د <=> _ ;

    "Dental D after a voiceless environment"
    Dvl:ت <=> _ ;
